District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

38-1950

Leave of absence for educational purposes — Inclusion for promotion and retirement purposes.

Repealed.

History

June 12, 1940, 54 Stat. 350, ch. 342, § 5
Aug. 21, 1964, 78 Stat. 585, Pub. L. 88-472, § 3
Mar. 16, 1982, D.C. Law 4-78, § 17, 29 DCR 49

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 31-1015.
1973 Ed., § 31-636.